Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 1

Regional Planning Commission

13-3-101. Planning regions — Creation of commissions — Members — Training and continuing education.

The department of economic and community development may create and establish planning regions and define the boundaries respectively of such planning regions. Any such planning region may, in accordance with the boundary definition made by the department, be composed of the territory of a single county or of two (2) or more contiguous whole counties or of a part of a county or of contiguous parts of two (2) or more counties or of one (1) or more counties, together with a part or parts of another county or other counties or any other territory as designated and defined by the department whether the boundaries thereof conform to any existing boundary or boundaries of a county or counties of other political subdivision or subdivisions or do not so conform.

The department may create and establish a regional planning commission of any planning region created and defined under this section, with members selected in accordance with subsections (c)-(h); however, if the planning region consists of a single county, the members of the regional planning commission are to be selected according to provisions of subsection (i).

The number of members of any such commission shall be determined by the commissioner, but shall not be less than five (5) nor more than fifteen (15).

The commissioner may designate, as members of a regional planning commission, persons who are members of county legislative bodies or of boards of aldermen or commissioners or other municipal legislative bodies; provided, that the members of the regional planning commission, so designated from county and municipal legislative bodies shall be less in number than a majority of the commission, and that not less than a majority of the members of the commission shall hold no salaried public office or position whatever, excepting offices or faculty memberships of a university or other educational institution.

Each person shall be nominated in writing by the chief elected officer of any county having a metropolitan form of government, the county mayor of any other county, or the chief elected officer of any municipality lying inside of the boundary of the planning region before being designated by the commissioner.

All nominations must be received by the department within thirty (30) days after the creation of a new regional planning commission or within thirty (30) days after a position is vacated on an existing commission. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a member of any commission is authorized to continue to serve until the member's successor has been nominated and approved as stated herein.

In making such appointments, the commissioner shall strive to ensure that the racial composition of each regional planning commission is at least proportionately reflective of the region's racial minority population.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2), the county or municipal legislative body of a local government participating in a regional planning region may establish the compensation for each member nominated by the respective unit of local government. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

If members of such commission also serve as the zoning board for any county which has adopted zoning, such members may be compensated in an amount to be fixed by the county legislative body of such county and may be allowed necessary traveling and other expenses while engaged in the work of or for the commission or the zoning board.

The term of any member designated from a county or municipal legislative body shall be coterminous with such member's then term as a member of such county or municipal body.

The terms of appointed members, as distinguished from members designated from a county or municipal legislative body, shall be four (4) years, except that the terms of three (3) of the members first appointed to any regional commission shall be one (1), two (2) and three (3) years respectively.

The commissioner may remove a member of such a commission for cause specified in writing served on the member and after hearing, of which such member shall be given not less than fifteen (15) days' written notice.

Any vacancy in the membership of such a commission shall be filled by the commissioner for the unexpired term, except that if such vacancy is filled by designation from a county or municipal legislative body, the term of the member so designated shall be coterminous with such member's then term as member of such body.

Authority granted under this section to the commissioner or to the department shall be exercised with the approval of the local government planning advisory committee.

In the event the boundaries of an existing planning region, as determined by the department of economic and community development, conform to the existing boundaries of a single county, the members of the regional planning commission for that region shall be appointed by the county mayor, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body.

The number of members of any such commission shall be determined by the county legislative body, but shall not be less than five (5) nor more than fifteen (15).

The composition of such regional planning commission, the compensation of its members and the terms of service are subject to the same restrictions as stated in subdivision (c)(2) and subsections (d) and (e).

Any vacancy in the membership of such regional planning commission shall be filled through appointment by the county mayor, subject to confirmation by the county legislative body.

The county legislative body may remove a member of such a commission for cause specified in writing served on the member and after hearing, of which such member shall be given not less than fifteen (15) days' written notice.

A member of any such regional planning commission who is serving on the date this provision becomes effective may continue to serve for the term to which that person was appointed.

In the event that a county and a municipality or municipalities lying within such county, pursuant to local agreement, statute, or otherwise, participate jointly in a planning region, then members of the planning commission for such a region shall be selected and governed according to subsections (c)-(h).

Each planning commissioner shall, within one (1) year of initial appointment and each calendar year thereafter, attend a minimum of four (4) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (j)(5). At least one (1) hour of the annual education requirement shall concentrate on the rights of private property owners and the relationship of those rights to the public planning process.

Each full-time or contract professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the planning commission shall, each calendar year, attend a minimum of eight (8) hours of training and continuing education in one (1) or more of the subjects listed in subdivision (j)(5). A professional planner who is a member of the American Institute of Certified Planners (AICP) shall be exempt from this requirement.

Each of the individuals listed in subdivisions (j)(1) and (2) shall certify by December 31 of each calendar year such individual's attendance by a written statement filed with the secretary of such individual's respective planning commission. Each statement shall identify the date of each program attended, its subject matter, location, sponsors, and the time spent in each program. A professional planner who is a member of the AICP shall be exempt from this requirement.

The legislative body of a county in a single county regional planning commission, or the legislative bodies of the counties in a multiple county planning commission, or the legislative bodies of the county and the municipality in a joint municipal and county planning commission shall be responsible for paying the training and continuing education course registration and travel expenses for each planning commissioner and full-time professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the planning commission.

The subjects for the training and continuing education required by subdivisions (j)(1) and (2) shall include, but not be limited to, the following: land use planning; zoning; flood plain management; transportation; community facilities; ethics; public utilities; wireless telecommunications facilities; parliamentary procedure; public hearing procedure; land use law; natural resources and agricultural land conservation; economic development; housing; public buildings; land subdivision; and powers and duties of the planning commission. Other topics reasonably related to the duties of planning commission members or professional planners or other administrative officials whose duties include advising the planning commission may be approved by majority vote of the planning commission prior to December 31 of the year for which credit is sought.

Each local planning commission shall keep its official public record originals of all statements and the written documentation of attendance required to comply with these provisions for three (3) years after the calendar year in which each statement and appurtenant written documentation is filed.

Each planning commissioner and each professional planner or other administrative official whose duties include advising the planning commission shall be responsible for obtaining written documentation signed by a representative of the sponsor of any training and continuing education course for which credit is claimed, acknowledging the fact that the individual attended the program for which credit is claimed. A member of the AICP shall be exempt from this requirement.

If a planning commissioner fails to complete the requisite number of hours of training and continuing education within the time allotted by this subsection (j) or fails to file the statement required by this subsection (j), then this shall constitute a cause for the removal of the planning commission member from the planning commission.

The legislative body of a county in a single county regional planning commission, the legislative bodies of the counties in a multiple county planning commission or the legislative bodies of the county and the municipality in a joint municipal and county planning commission may, at any time, opt out of this subsection (j) by passage of a resolution or ordinance, as appropriate; provided, that for a multiple county planning commission or joint municipal/county planning commission, all governmental entities included in such multiple or joint planning commission must pass the resolution or ordinance in order to opt out of this provision. Further, any such legislative bodies that have opted out may, at a later date, opt in by passage of a resolution or ordinance in the same manner required to opt out.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.15 (Williams, § 552.15); Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 13; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(137); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-201; Acts 1982, ch. 619, § 1; 1983, ch. 442, §§ 7, 8; 1993, ch. 135, § 1; 1993, ch. 394, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 98, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 501, § 10; 1996, ch. 977, § 1; 1999, ch. 93, § 1; 2002, ch. 862, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2009, ch. 47, §§ 1-3; 2013, ch. 456, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2002, ch. 862, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Planning Commission and Board of Zoning Appeals Training and Continuing Education Act of 2002.”

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Local government planning advisory committee, § 4-3-727.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Open space, agricultural and forest land preservation, commission duties, §§ 11-15-107, 11-15-108, 67-5-1007.

“Regional planning commission” defined, § 13-3-401.

Utility location, title 13, ch. 24, part 3.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Law Reviews.

Revitalizing Urban Cities: Linking the Past to the Present, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 973 (2016).

Saving Our Cities: Land Banking in Tennessee, 46 U. Mem. L. Rev. 927 (2016).

Attorney General Opinions. Confirmation of nominees by county legislative body not required, OAG 94-143, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (12/13/94).

Review of zoning plans and amendments by regional planning commission of each affected region, OAG 99-150, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 158 (8/16/99).

Right of municipality to separate planning region designation; right of municipality to provide zoning and subdivision regulations outside corporate limits but within urban growth boundaries, OAG 99-227, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 229 (12/6/99).

City manager is not authorized to hire, supervise, and discipline individuals designated as staff of the city planning commission, OAG 05-057, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (4/20/05).

Members of the Blount County regional planning commission, OAG 05-1919, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 121 (7/27/05).

13-3-102. Municipal commission designated as regional planning commission.

In the event that, acting under the power granted to it in parts 1-3 of this chapter, the department of economic and community development creates and establishes any planning region composed of the territory of a single municipality, together with territory adjoining but outside of such municipality, no part of which is outside the municipality's urban growth boundary, or, if no such boundary exists, more than five (5) miles beyond the limits of such municipality, and in the further event that such municipality has a municipal planning commission, then in such event the department, in lieu of creating, designating and appointing a new regional planning commission for such region, may designate the municipal commission as the regional planning commission of such region, and when so designated, the commission, when acting as a regional commission for such region, shall have all the powers and be governed by the provisions set forth in parts 1-3 of this chapter, or in any other statutory provision relating to regional planning commissions; provided, that the department shall not have power of appointment or removal of any member of such municipal planning commission serving regional areas. At least one (1) member of a municipal planning commission composed of five (5) members, and two (2) members of a municipal planning commission composed of more than five (5) members but less than eleven (11) members, who are appointed to the municipal planning commission designated as a regional planning commission, shall reside within the regional area outside of the municipal boundaries served by the regional planning commission; provided, that, if the regional area outside of the municipal boundaries is less than fifty percent (50%) of the entire regional area, then only one (1) member of the municipal planning commission shall be appointed from the regional area outside the municipal boundaries regardless of the number of members on the municipal planning commission, or, in the alternative, the municipal planning commission may be increased in size by the number of members who are appointed from the regional area outside the municipal boundaries. The acceptance of any such designation shall not, however, be obligatory upon but shall be subject to the consent of the designated municipal planning commission. Authority granted under this section to the department shall be exercised with the approval of the local government planning advisory committee.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 9; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.15 (Williams, § 552.15); Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 14; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-202; Acts 1998, ch. 1101, § 25; 2007, ch. 253, § 1; 2009, ch. 600, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Planning regulations applicable to municipality within planning commission region, OAG 94-89, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 90 (8/26/94).

Extraterritorial zoning by cities under county growth plan, OAG 99-218, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 180 (11/4/99).

1998 Tenn. Pub. Acts Ch. 1101 does not require the local government planning advisory committee to automatically expand the planning region of a municipal planning commission to encompass the entire area of that city's urban growth boundary; however, if the committee determines that such an expansion, as a policy matter, is appropriate in all cases, the committee may approve it, subject to the requirements in T.C.A. § 13-3-102, including the city's acceptance of the expansion, OAG 01-092, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 83 (6/4/01).

Regional planning commission's authority in urban growth areas. OAG 13-31, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 32 (4/18/13).

13-3-103. Organization of regional planning commissions — Planning director — Expenses — Rules and records.

Each regional planning commission shall elect its chair from among its appointed members. The term of the chair shall be one (1) year with eligibility for reelection. Each regional planning commission shall adopt rules for the transaction of business which shall include, but not be limited to, the selection of additional officers from among its members it deems appropriate to fulfill the organizational needs of the regional planning commission, the requirements for the regional planning commission to make findings of fact, statements of material evidence and reasons for its actions as part of each motion or action of the regional planning commission and the keeping of a record of its resolutions, transactions, motions, actions, and determinations which shall be a public record. Any provision relating to the appointment of a planning director contained in any metropolitan or county charter or private act or interlocal agreement must be used in appointing a planning director. In the absence of such a provision, the county mayor, county executive or metropolitan mayor or executive shall, in accordance with § 5-6-106(c), have the authority to appoint a planning director, who shall be qualified by membership in the American Institute of Certified Planners, experienced in city, regional or state planning or educated in a related academic field. Any person serving as a planning director on March 31, 2010, shall not be required to meet the aforementioned qualifications. The planning director shall have the power and authority to hire and fix the compensation, within the funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose, of such other employees and staff as the director may deem necessary for the work of the planning commission. The regional planning commission may also contract with planners or other experts for such services as it may require within the funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose. The trustee or other appropriate financial official of the county or metropolitan government, within the funds appropriated by the legislative body for this purpose, will disperse funds for the salary or salaries of the planning director and staff and the operational expenses of the planning office and the contracted services of planners or other experts retained to provide assistance to and studies, plans, reviews and reports for the regional planning commission. A regional planning commission serving a single county may also receive and expend funds from grants, gifts, contracts, fees, and appropriations from federal, state, other local governments or private sources for the purpose of carrying on its planning functions, subject to appropriation of the county legislative body. A multi-jurisdictional regional planning commission may receive and expend funds from grants, gifts, contracts, fees, and appropriations from federal, state, other local governments or private sources for the purpose of carrying on its planning functions in accordance with the interlocal agreement which created the commission.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.16 (Williams, § 552.16); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-203; Acts 2010, ch. 701, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds absent appropriation.

Attorney General Opinions. Compensation of employees of commission, OAG 94-143, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (12/13/94).

A regional planning commission may seek funding from the department of economic and community development; may seek grants; or may be funded under an agreement among the local governments within the region, OAG 05-057, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (4/20/05).

Appointment of planning director. OAG 11-15, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 17 (2/9/11).

13-3-104. Powers and functions of commission.

It is the further duty of a regional planning commission to promote the mutual cooperation of the planning commissions of municipalities within the region, and the coordination of the plans of such municipalities with the plan of the region, and generally to confer with and advise municipal and county mayors and legislative bodies and officials for the purpose of promoting a coordinated and adjusted development of the region. Any such commission may also advise county and municipal legislative bodies with respect to the formulation of public improvement programs and the financing of such programs. It may also cooperate with the planning, legislative or executive authorities of neighboring states, regions, counties or municipalities for the purpose of promoting coordination between the development of the region and adjoining or neighboring territory.

All municipal, county and other local public officials shall, upon request, furnish to the commission, within a reasonable time, such available information as it may require for its work.

The commission, its members and employees, in the performance of its functions, may enter upon any land and make examinations and surveys and place and maintain necessary monuments and marks on such land.

In general, the commission has such powers as may be necessary for it to perform its functions and to promote regional planning.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.21 (Williams, § 552.21); impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-208; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Plats, acting upon after submission, § 13-3-404.

Platting authority, § 13-3-402.

13-3-105. Public works in planning regions — Approval by department of economic and community development.

From and after the time of the creation and defining by the department of economic and community development of a planning region, and the appointment by the department of a regional planning commission of such region, thenceforth the department of transportation or any other state department shall not agree to supply or appropriate money for the construction of any road, bridge, or other public structure within the region, nor shall any state department construct or contribute to the construction of any street, road or other public structure within any municipality in the region, nor shall any county lying wholly or partly within the region participate in the expenditure of the funds of any state department or be aided in the construction of any road, bridge, or other public structure within the region, nor shall state liability be incurred incident to the acquisition of rights-of-way or other property for any highway or other public improvement within the region, nor any other state aid be given for any road, bridge, building or other public structure within the region, until and unless such supply, appropriation, construction, contribution, participation, liability or aid has been submitted to the department of economic and community development and until the department has given and reported its judgment, opinion and recommendations thereon to the court, board, official or department having charge of such acquisition, supply, appropriation, contribution, participation, liability, aid, construction, or authorization; provided, that in the event that the department fails to make such report within thirty (30) days from and after the date of the submission to it, this requirement shall be deemed to have been waived; and in passing upon the question of its approval, the department may take into account the quality of the work of the regional planning commission; the object of this requirement being to promote the application of planning methods and principles in the location, character and extent of public works financed with the help of state aid.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.22 (Williams, § 552.22); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-209.